Vermont, session 2025-2026, H819.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Organization of the Agency of Human Services * * *
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 3089 is amended to read:
§ 3089. DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HEALTH
The Department of Mental Health is created within the Agency of Human
Services as the successor to and the continuation of the Division Divisions of
Mental Health Services and of Substance Use Programs of the Department of
Health. The Department of Mental Health shall be responsible for the
operation of the Vermont State Hospital or its successor in interest as defined
in subdivision 455(28) of this title.
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 2 of 21
* * * Impaired Driving * * *
Sec. 2. 7 V.S.A. § 656 is amended to read:
§ 656. PERSON 12 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER AND UNDER 21 YEARS
OF AGE MISREPRESENTING AGE, PROCURING, POSSESSING,
OR CONSUMING ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; IMPAIRED
DRIVING; POSSESSION OF CANNABIS; CIVIL VIOLATION
* * *
(b) Prohibited conduct; offenses.
* * *
(3) Impaired driver penalties.
(A) A person who violates subdivision (1)(E) of this subsection (b)
commits a civil violation, shall be referred to the Court Diversion Program for
the purpose of enrollment in the Youth Substance Awareness Safety Program,
and the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall suspend the person’s operator’s
license and privilege to operate a motor vehicle in accordance with subdivision
(B) of this subdivision (b)(3). A person who fails to complete the Program
successfully commits a civil violation under the jurisdiction of the Judicial
Bureau and shall be subject to the following:
(i) For a first offense, a civil penalty of $300.00 and suspension of
the person’s operator’s license and privilege to operate a motor vehicle for a
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 3 of 21
period of 180 days and compliance with the requirements of 23 V.S.A.
§ 1209a(a)(1).
* * *
(vii) The Alcohol and Driving Program required under this section
shall be administered by the Department of Mental Health’s Division of
Substance Use Programs and shall take into consideration any particular
treatment needs of operators under 21 years of age.
* * *
* * * Department of Health; General Provisions * * *
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 1 is amended to read:
§ 1. GENERAL POWERS OF DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
In accordance with this title, the Department of Health shall have power to
supervise and direct the execution of all laws relating to public health and
substance abuse.
Sec. 4. 18 V.S.A. § 5 is amended to read:
§ 5. DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
The Department of Health shall:
(1) Conduct studies, develop State plans, and administer programs and
State plans for hospital survey and construction, hospital operation and
maintenance, and medical care, and treatment of substance abuse.
* * *
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 4 of 21
Sec. 5. 18 V.S.A. § 13 is amended to read:
§ 13. COMMUNITY VIOLENCE PREVENTION PROGRAM
* * *
(b)(1) A Vermont municipality or nonprofit organization may submit an
application for a Community Violence Prevention Program grant to the
Commissioner of Health. Grants awarded under this section shall be for the
purpose of funding innovative, evidence-based, or evidence-informed
approaches to reducing violence and associated community harm.
(2) The Commissioner of Health, in consultation with the Department of
Public Safety, the Department of Mental Health, and the Executive Director of
Racial Equity, shall develop and publish guidelines for the award of
Community Violence Prevention Program grants. The guidelines shall include
a focus on increasing community capacity to implement approaches for human
services, public health, and public safety collaboration to address root causes
of community violence and substance use through data-driven projects.
* * *
* * * Duties of the Commissioner of Health * * *
Sec. 6. 18 V.S.A. § 104b is amended to read:
§ 104b. COMMUNITY HEALTH AND WELLNESS GRANTS
(a) The Commissioner, in consultation with the Commissioner of Mental
Health, shall establish a program for awarding competitive, substantial,
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 5 of 21
multiyear grants to comprehensive community health and wellness projects.
Successful projects must:
(1) use comprehensive approaches designed to promote healthy
behavior and disease prevention across the community and across the lifespan
of individual Vermonters and address issues that may include promoting
nutrition and exercise for children, community recreation programs, elderly
wellness, lead poisoning abatement, obesity prevention, maternal and child
health and immunization, mental health and substance abuse, and tobacco
prevention and cessation;
* * *
* * * Opioid Use Disorder * * *
Sec. 7. 18 V.S.A. § 4751 is amended to read:
§ 4751. PURPOSE
It is the purpose of this chapter to authorize the Departments of Mental
Health and of Vermont Health Access to establish a regional system of opioid
addiction treatment.
Sec. 8. 18 V.S.A. § 4752 is amended to read:
§ 4752. OPIOID USE DISORDER TREATMENT SYSTEM
(a) The Departments of Mental Health and of Vermont Health Access shall
establish by rule in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 a regional system of
opioid use disorder treatment.
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 6 of 21
(b) The rules may address requirements for pharmacological treatment,
including initial assessments, ongoing follow-up, provider education, and
diversion prevention.
(c) Controlled substances for treating opioid use disorder shall be dispensed
only by:
(1) a treatment program authorized by the Department of Mental Health;
or
(2) a health care provider who is not affiliated with an authorized
treatment program but who meets federal requirements for use of controlled
substances in the pharmacological treatment of opioid use disorder.
(d) Controlled substances for use in treatment of opioid use disorder may
be prescribed via telehealth in accordance with federal requirements.
(e) The Department of Vermont Health Access or the Department’s
Department of Mental Health’s pharmacy benefits manager shall not require a
health care provider to document a patient’s adverse reaction to a medication
prior to prescribing an alternative medication for opioid use disorder to the
patient.
* * * Opioid Settlement * * *
Sec. 9. 18 V.S.A. § 4772 is amended to read:
§ 4772. OPIOID SETTLEMENT ADVISORY COMMITTEE
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 7 of 21
(a) Creation. There is created the Opioid Settlement Advisory Committee
to provide advice and recommendations regarding remediation spending from
the Opioid Abatement Special Fund established pursuant to this subchapter.
(b) Membership.
(1) The Advisory Committee shall be composed of the following
members and shall reflect the diversity of Vermont in terms of gender, race,
age, ethnicity, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, and
socioeconomic status and ensure inclusion of individuals with lived experience
of opioid use disorder and their family members whenever possible:
(A) the Commissioner of Mental Health or designee, who shall serve
as a nonvoting chair;
* * *
(c) Powers and duties. The Advisory Committee shall demonstrate broad
ongoing consultation with individuals living with opioid use disorder about
their direct experience with related systems, including medication for opioid
use disorder, residential treatment, recovery services, harm reduction services,
overdose, supervision by the Department of Corrections, and involvement with
the Department for Children and Families’ Family Services Division. To that
end, the Advisory Committee shall demonstrate consultation with individuals
with direct lived experience of opioid use disorder, frontline support
professionals, the Substance Misuse Oversight Prevention and Advisory
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 8 of 21
Council, and other stakeholders to identify spending priorities as related to
opioid use disorder prevention, intervention, treatment, and recovery services
and harm reduction strategies for the purpose of providing recommendations to
the Governor, the Department of Mental Health, and the General Assembly on
prioritizing spending from the Opioid Abatement Special Fund. The Advisory
Committee shall consider:
* * *
(d) Assistance. The Advisory Committee shall have the administrative,
technical, and legal assistance of the Department of Mental Health.
(e) Presentation. Annually, the Advisory Committee shall vote on its
recommendations. Recommendations shall be informed by outcomes and
measurements reported by previous grantees. If the recommendations are
supported by an affirmative vote of the majority, the Advisory Committee shall
present its recommendations for expenditures from the Opioid Abatement
Special Fund established pursuant to this subchapter to the Department of
Mental Health and concurrently submit its recommendations in writing to the
House Committees on Appropriations and on Human Services and the Senate
Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare. The Advisory
Committee’s written recommendations shall address how each
recommendation meets one or more of the criteria listed in subsections 4774(b)
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 9 of 21
and (c) of this subchapter. The Advisory Committee shall give priority
consideration to services requiring funding on an ongoing basis.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Commissioner of Mental Health shall call the first meeting of
the Advisory Committee to occur on or before June 30, 2022.
* * *
Sec. 10. 18 V.S.A. § 4773 is amended to read:
§ 4773. DESIGNATION OF LEAD STATE AGENCY
The Department of Mental Health shall serve as the lead State agency and
single point of contact for submitting requests for funding to the national
settlement fund administrator. Approved requests shall be disbursed to the
Department for deposit into the Opioid Abatement Special Fund established in
section 4774 of this subchapter.
Sec. 11. 18 V.S.A. § 4774 is amended to read:
§ 4774. OPIOID ABATEMENT SPECIAL FUND
(a)(1) There is created the Opioid Abatement Special Fund, a special fund
established and managed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5 and
administered by the Department of Mental Health. The Opioid Abatement
Special Fund shall consist of all abatement account fund monies disbursed to
the Department from the national abatement account fund, the national opioid
abatement trust, the supplemental opioid abatement fund, or any other
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 10 of 21
settlement funds that must be utilized exclusively for opioid prevention,
intervention, treatment, recovery, and harm reduction services.
(2) The Department shall submit a spending plan to the General
Assembly, informed by the recommendations of the Opioid Settlement
Advisory Committee established pursuant to section 4772 of this subchapter,
annually on or before January 15 and once funding is appropriated by the
General Assembly from the Opioid Abatement Special Fund, the Department
shall request to have the funds formally released from the national abatement
account fund, the national opioid abatement trust, the supplemental opioid
abatement fund, or any other settlement funds that must be utilized exclusively
for opioid prevention, intervention, treatment, recovery, and harm reduction
services. The Department shall disburse monies from the Opioid Abatement
Special Fund pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 3.
* * *
(b) Expenditures from the Opioid Abatement Special Fund shall be used
for the following opioid prevention, intervention, treatment, recovery, harm
reduction, and evaluation activities:
* * *
(13) the cost of the administrative, technical, and legal assistance
provided to the Advisory Committee by the Department of Mental Health.
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 11 of 21
(c) Priority for expenditures from the Opioid Abatement Special Fund shall
be aimed at reducing overdose deaths, including the following:
* * *
(7) supporting prevention programs, specifically:
(A) funding for media campaigns to prevent opioid misuse;
(B) funding for evidence-based or evidence-informed prevention in
schools;
(C) funding for health care provider education and outreach
regarding best prescribing practices for opioids consistent with current
Department of Mental Health and U.S. Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention guidelines, including providers at hospitals;
(D) funding for community drug disposal programs; and
(E) funding and training for first responders to participate in pre-
arrest diversion programs, post-overdose response teams, or similar strategies
that connect at-risk individuals to mental health services and supports;
* * *
* * * Substance Misuse Generally * * *
Sec. 12. 18 V.S.A. § 4803 is amended to read:
§ 4803. SUBSTANCE MISUSE PREVENTION OVERSIGHT AND
ADVISORY COUNCIL
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 12 of 21
(a) Creation. There is created the Substance Misuse Prevention Oversight
and Advisory Council within the Department of Mental Health to improve the
health outcomes of all Vermonters through a consolidated and holistic
approach to substance misuse prevention that addresses all categories of
substances. The Council shall provide advice to the Governor and General
Assembly for improving prevention policies and programming throughout the
State and to ensure that population prevention measures are at the forefront of
all policy determinations. The Advisory Council’s prevention initiatives shall
encompass all substances at risk of misuse, including:
* * *
(b) Membership.
(1) The agenda of the Council shall be determined by an executive
committee composed of the following members:
(A) the Commissioner of Mental Health or designee, who shall serve
as chair;
* * *
(h) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Council who are
not employed by the State or whose participation is not supported through their
employment or association shall be entitled to per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more
than six meetings per year, unless further authorized by the Commissioner of
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 13 of 21
Health. Payments to members of the Council authorized under this subsection
shall be made from monies appropriated to the Department of Mental Health.
Sec. 13. 18 V.S.A. § 4804 is amended to read:
§ 4804. MANAGER OF SUBSTANCE MISUSE PREVENTION
There is created the permanent position of the Manager of Substance
Misuse Prevention within the Department of Mental Health for the purpose of:
(1) coordinating the work of the Substance Misuse Prevention Oversight
and Advisory Council established pursuant to section 4803 of this title; and
(2) coordinating regional planning.
Sec. 14. 18 V.S.A. § 4806 is amended to read:
§ 4806. DIVISION OF SUBSTANCE USE PROGRAMS
(a) The Division of Substance Use Programs shall plan, operate, and
evaluate a consistent, effective program of substance use programs. All duties,
responsibilities, and authority of the Division shall be carried out and exercised
by and within the Department of Mental Health.
(b) The Division shall be responsible for the following services:
(1) prevention and intervention;
(2) [Repealed.]
(3) project CRASH schools; and
(4) alcohol and drug treatment.
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 14 of 21
(c) Under the direction of the Commissioner of Mental Health, the Division
shall review and approve all alcohol and drug programs developed or
administered by any State agency or department.
(d) Any federal or private funds received by the State for purposes of
subdivision (b)(4) of this section shall be in the budget of and administered by
the Department of Mental Health.
(e) [Repealed.]
Sec. 15. 18 V.S.A. § 4812 is amended to read:
§ 4812. SUBSTANCE MISUSE PREVENTION SPECIAL FUND
(a) The Substance Misuse Prevention Special Fund is established and
managed by the Vermont Department of Mental Health in accordance with 32
V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5.
* * *
* * * Department of Mental Health; General Provisions * * *
Sec. 16. 18 V.S.A. § 7201 is amended to read:
§ 7201. MENTAL HEALTH
(a) The Department of Mental Health, as the successor to the Division
Divisions of Mental Health Services and of Substance Use Programs of the
Department of Health, shall centralize and more efficiently establish the
general policy and execute the programs and services of the State concerning
mental health, substance use, and integrate and coordinate those programs and
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 15 of 21
services with the programs and services of other departments of the State, its
political subdivisions, and private agencies, so as to provide a flexible
comprehensive service to all citizens of the State in mental health, substance
use, and related problems.
(b) The Department shall ensure equal access to appropriate mental health
care and substance use programming in a manner equivalent to other aspects of
health care as part of an integrated, holistic system of care.
Sec. 17. 18 V.S.A. § 7202 is amended to read:
§ 7202. COORDINATION
The Department of Mental Health shall be responsible for coordinating
efforts of all agencies and services, government and private, on a statewide
basis in order to promote and improve the mental health of individuals through
outreach, education, and other activities, including substance use prevention
and treatment programming. The Department of Disabilities, Aging, and
Independent Living shall be responsible for coordinating the efforts of all
agencies and services, government and private, on a statewide basis in order to
promote and improve the lives of individuals with developmental disabilities.
Sec. 18. 18 V.S.A. § 7206 is amended to read:
§ 7206. RECOMMENDATIONS AND REPORTS
The Department shall from time to time study comprehensively the
problems related to mental health problems of and substance use in the State,
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 16 of 21
develop programs for mental health services, substance use programming, and
recommend as to the integration within the Department of any other related
agencies and services as it considers proper. It shall also periodically review
and evaluate the mental health and substance use prevention and treatment
programs.
* * * Mental Health System of Care * * *
Sec. 19. 18 V.S.A. § 7253 is amended to read:
§ 7253. CLINICAL RESOURCE MANAGEMENT AND OVERSIGHT
The Commissioner of Mental Health, in consultation with health care
providers as defined in section 9432 of this title, including designated
hospitals, designated agencies, individuals with mental conditions or
psychiatric disabilities, and other stakeholders, shall design and implement a
clinical resource management system that ensures the highest quality of care
and facilitates long-term, sustained recovery for individuals in the custody of
the Commissioner.
* * *
(2) For the purpose of maintaining the integrity and effectiveness of the
clinical resource management system, the Department of Mental Health shall:
* * *
(B) coordinate care across the mental and physical health care
systems as well as ensure coordination within the Agency of Human Services,
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 17 of 21
particularly the Department of Corrections, the Department of Health’s
Division of Substance Use Programs, and the Department of Disabilities,
Aging, and Independent Living;
* * *
* * * Snowmobiles * * *
Sec. 20. 23 V.S.A. § 3207f is amended to read:
§ 3207f. PERSONS UNDER 21 YEARS OF AGE; ALCOHOL
CONCENTRATION OF 0.02 OR MORE
* * *
(f) The alcohol program required under this section shall be administered
by the Department of Mental Health’s Division of Substance Use Programs
and shall take into consideration any particular treatment needs of operators
under 21 years of age.
* * *
* * * Vessels * * *
Sec. 21. 23 V.S.A. § 3323a is amended to read:
§ 3323a. PERSONS UNDER 21 YEARS OF AGE; ALCOHOL
CONCENTRATION OF 0.02 OR MORE
* * *
(f) The alcohol program required under this section shall be administered
by the Department of Mental Health’s Division of Substance Use Programs
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 18 of 21
and shall take into consideration any particular treatment needs of operators
under 21 years of age.
* * *
* * * Regulation of Pharmacists * * *
Sec. 22. 26 V.S.A. § 2080 is amended to read:
§ 2080. NALOXONE HYDROCHLORIDE; DISPENSING OR
FURNISHING
(a) The Board of Pharmacy shall adopt protocols for licensed pharmacists
to dispense or otherwise furnish naloxone hydrochloride to patients who do not
hold an individual prescription for naloxone hydrochloride. Such protocols
shall be consistent with rules adopted by the Commissioner of Mental Health.
* * *
* * * Peer Recovery Support Specialists * * *
Sec. 23. 26 V.S.A. § 3191 is amended to read:
§ 3191. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(4) “Code of Ethics for Certified Peer Recovery Support Specialists”
means the code of ethics for certified peer recovery support specialists
approved and adopted by the Department of Mental Health.
* * *
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 19 of 21
(11) “Peer recovery support specialist credentialing body” means the
entity authorized by the Department of Mental Health to, in addition to other
duties:
(A) issue credentials to peer recovery support specialists to
demonstrate that a peer recovery support specialist has met qualifications for
certification under this chapter; and
(B) approve acceptable continuing education courses.
Sec. 24. 26 V.S.A. § 3193 is amended to read:
§ 3193. DUTIES OF THE DIRECTOR
* * *
(b) After consultation with the Commissioners of Health and
Commissioner of Mental Health, the Director shall adopt and amend rules as
necessary pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to perform the Director’s duties
under this chapter.
Sec. 25. 26 V.S.A. § 3194 is amended to read:
§ 3194. ADVISOR APPOINTEES
(a)(1) After consultation with the Commissioners of Health and
Commissioner of Mental Health, the Secretary of State shall appoint two
certified peer support providers, two certified peer recovery support specialists,
one representative from the Department of Health, and one representative two
representatives from the Department of Mental Health to serve as advisors to
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 20 of 21
the Director in matters relating to peer support and recovery support. Advisors
shall be appointed to five-year staggered terms to serve as advisors in matters
related to the administration of this chapter. At least one of the initial
appointments shall be less than a five-year term.
* * *
* * * Juvenile Justice Director * * *
Sec. 26. 33 V.S.A. § 5272 is amended to read:
§ 5272. JUVENILE JUSTICE UNIT; JUVENILE JUSTICE DIRECTOR
* * *
(c) The Juvenile Justice Director shall ensure that the following occur:
* * *
(3) cooperation among appropriate departments, including the
Department; the Agency of Education; the Departments of Corrections, of
Labor, of Mental Health, of Public Safety, and of Disabilities, Aging, and
Independent Living; and the Department of Mental Health’s Division of
Substance Use Programs;
* * *
* * * Transfer of Rulemaking Authority * * *
Sec. 27. TRANSFER OF RULEMAKING AUTHORITY
The Department of Mental Health shall assume the rulemaking authority for
rules under the per view of the Department of Health’s Division of Substance
VT LEG #386022 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.819
2026 Page 21 of 21
Use Programs. The rules of the Department of Health’s Division of Substance
Use Programs in effect on July 1, 2027, shall be the rules of the Department of
Mental Health until they are amended or repealed.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 28. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
VT LEG #386022 v.1